Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-1212] Duties of the State and
county. (a) The administrator of the state procurement office shall
examine each inventory return filed as required by sections 103D-1206 and
103D-1207 and the director of finance of each county shall examine each inventory
return filed as required by section 103D-1208, and they shall add, if any,
items of property which should have been included with their full cash value,
correct and alter the valuations as may be required by truth and accuracy, and
enter in one or more books to be kept for the purpose and to be available at
all times for inspection by any taxpayer, all of the property and valuations
named in the inventories, as added to, revised, corrected, and classified for
convenience.

(b) The administrator of the state procurement
office or county director of finance shall charge the amounts of the
inventories to proper accounts on the general ledgers of the State or county so
that the values of the properties shall be shown and appear at all times in the
balance sheet of the books of the State or county.

(c) The director of taxation at all times
shall advise or assist the administrator of the state procurement office in the
valuation of all state property.

(d) The county engineers shall advise or
assist the director of finance of their respective counties as to the valuation
of the property belonging to the county. [L 1994, c 186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next